Washington statutes.
RCW 11.108.080

Generation-skipping transfer tax—Federal law application.

(1) A will or trust of a decedent who dies after December 31, 2009, and before January 1, 2011, is deemed to refer to the federal estate and generation-skipping transfer tax laws as they applied with respect to estates of decedents dying on December 31, 2009, if the will or trust contains a formula that:

(a) Refers to any of the following: "Unified credit," "estate tax exemption," "applicable exemption amount," "applicable credit amount," "applicable exclusion amount," "generation-skipping transfer tax exemption," "marital deduction," "maximum marital deduction," or "unlimited marital deduction;"

(b) Measures a share of an estate or trust based on the amount that can pass free of federal estate taxes or the amount that can pass free of federal generation-skipping transfer taxes; or

(c) Is otherwise based on a provision of federal estate tax or federal generation-skipping transfer tax law similar to the provisions in (a) or (b) of this subsection.

(2) This section is presumed to not apply with respect to a will or trust that (a) is executed or amended after December 31, 2009, or (b) clearly manifests an intent that a contrary rule applies in cases where the decedent dies on a date on which there is no then-applicable federal estate or federal generation-skipping transfer tax and such tax has been permanently repealed and not merely temporarily repealed for calendar year 2010.

(3) The reference to January 1, 2011, in this section refers, if the federal estate and generation-skipping transfer tax becomes effective before that date, to the first date on which such tax becomes legally effective.

(4) Construction of a will or trust under this section may be confirmed pursuant to the procedures set forth in the trust and estate dispute resolution act in chapter 11.96A RCW.

[ 2010 c 11 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—2010 c 11: "The legislature finds in order to carry out the intent of decedents in the construction of wills and trusts, and in order to promote judicial economy in the administration of trusts and estates, that it is necessary to construe certain formula clauses to refer to federal estate and generation-skipping transfer tax rules applicable to estates of decedents dying on December 31, 2009." [ 2010 c 11 s 1.]

Retroactive application—2010 c 11: "The provisions of this act are effective retroactive to December 31, 2009." [ 2010 c 11 s 4.]

Application—Construction—2010 c 11: "This act is remedial in nature and must be applied and construed liberally in order to carry out its intent." [ 2010 c 11 s 5.]

Effective date—2010 c 11: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 10, 2010]." [ 2010 c 11 s 7.]